Tennessee, session 114, SB0787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-121-106, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) The chief elevator inspector shall conduct a final acceptance inspection upon
completion of the installation, modification, or alteration of a private residence elevator
before such elevator is placed in service. Upon completion of the final acceptance
inspection of a private residence elevator, the homeowner shall register the private
residence elevator with the department. Registration must be made on a form furnished
by the department. The chief elevator inspector shall develop and maintain a database
of private residence elevators.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0787
002439
- 1 -